Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-142
Order; enforcement; procedure.

The court shall proceed to determine the matter speedily as a court of equity and without the formal pleadings and proceedings applicable to ordinary suits in equity but in such manner as to do justice in the premises. To this end, the court may direct and prosecute, in such manner and by such persons as it may appoint, all such inquiries as the court may think needful to enable it to form a just judgment in the matter of such petition.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 42, p. 1370;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 55.